Maryland, session 2025, SB0389.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Procedure
6–235.
(A) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, when sentencing a minor
convicted as an adult, a court:
(1) may impose a sentence less than the minimum term required under
law; and
(2) may not impose a sentence of life imprisonment without the possibility
of parole or release.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0389*

SENATE BILL 389
(B) (1) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, IF THE
COURT DETERMINES BY CLEAR AND CONVINCING EVIDENCE THAT THE INDIVIDUAL
AGAINST WHOM THE MINOR IS CONVICTED OF COMMITTING THE OFFENSE
PREVIOUSLY COMMITTED A SEX CRIME UNDER TITLE 3, SUBTITLE 3 OF THE
CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE OR HUMAN TRAFFICKING UNDER TITLE 3, SUBTITLE 11 OF
THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE AGAINST THE MINOR WITHIN 3 MONTHS BEFORE THE
OFFENSE FOR WHICH THE MINOR WAS CONVICTED, THE COURT MAY TRANSFER THE
MINOR TO THE JUVENILE COURT FOR SENTENCING.
(2) IF A MINOR IS TRANSFERRED TO THE JURISDICTION OF THE
JUVENILE COURT UNDER THIS SUBSECTION, THE JUVENILE COURT SHALL MAKE A
JUVENILE DISPOSITION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.